Utah statutes.
11-42-501.   Assessment constitutes a lien -- Characteristics of an assessment lien.

(1)  Each assessment levied under this chapter, including any installment of an assessment, interest, and any penalties and costs of collection, constitutes a lien against the property assessed as of the effective date of the assessment resolution or ordinance.

(2)  A lien under this section:

(a)  is superior to the lien of a trust deed, mortgage, mechanic's or materialman's lien, or other encumbrances;

(b)  is equal to and on a parity with a lien for general property taxes;

(c)  applies without interruption, change in priority, or alteration in any manner to any reduced payment obligations; and

(d)  continues until the assessments, reduced payment obligations, and any interest, penalties, and costs are paid, despite a sale of the property for or on account of a delinquent general property tax, special tax, or other assessment or the issuance of a tax deed, an assignment of interest by the county, or a sheriff's certificate of sale or deed.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

